Illinois, session 104th, HB5229.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.88 and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)7    Sec. 10-20.88. Appeal process to access blocked websites. 8For websites that are blocked from being accessed by a student 9on a school-issued electronic device, each school board shall 10develop an appeal process by which a student, at the request of 11the student's parent or guardian, may access a blocked website 12if the website is reasonably related to the student's 13education or pursuit of work opportunities during or after 14high school. 15    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)16    Sec. 34-18.88. Appeal process to access blocked websites. 17For websites that are blocked from being accessed by a student 18on a school-issued electronic device, the board shall develop 19an appeal process by which a student, at the request of the 20student's parent or guardian, may access a blocked website if 21the website is reasonably related to the student's education 22or pursuit of work opportunities during or after high school.